Tennessee, session 114, SB0399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 5, Chapter 14, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, in a county that has adopted this
part, the county legislative body may require a competitive bid process for insurance
brokerage services.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0399
002273
- 1 -